apertium-mar-eng.mar.dix
    <pardef n="शोध/णे__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l>णे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ाल</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ेन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="विचार/णे__vblex">
      <e><p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>णार</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="आवड/णे__vblex">
      <e><p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>णार</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>   
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="झोप/णे__vblex">
      <e><p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>णार</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>त</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>ायला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ली</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="एक__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दोन"><i>दोन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="चार"><i>चार</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पाच"><i>पाच</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सहा"><i>सहा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="आठ"><i>आठ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="नऊ"><i>नऊ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दहा"><i>दहा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="अकरा"><i>अकरा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="बारा"><i>बारा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="विचारणे"><i>विचार</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मोजणे"><i>मोज</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="करणे"><i>कर</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खाणे"><i>खा</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="शोधणे"><i>शोध</i><par n="शोध/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="संपणे"><i>संप</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="शकणे"><i>शक</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आवडणे"><i>आवड</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाहणे"><i>पाह</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पळणे"><i>पळ</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लपणे"><i>लप</i><par n="आवड/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खेळणे"><i>खेळ</i><par n="विचार/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="झोपणे"><i>झोप</i><par n="झोप/णे__vblex"/></e>
